Hawaii statutes.
§428-202 Organization. (a) One
or more persons may organize a limited liability company, consisting of one or
more members, by delivering articles of organization to the office of the
director for filing.

(b) The existence of a limited liability company
begins when the articles of organization are filed.

(c) The filing of the articles of organization
by the director is conclusive proof that the organizers satisfied all
conditions precedent to the creation of the organization. [L 1996, c 92,
pt of §1; am L 1997, c 4, §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next